incubator/apertium-pes/dev/apertium-far.far.dix
	<pardef n="fel__v">
	    <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>	
		<e><p><l>ه<b/>ام</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prsp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ه‌ام</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prsp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ه<b/>ای</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prsp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ه‌ای</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prsp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ه<b/>است</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prsp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ه</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prsp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ه<b/>ایم</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prsp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ه‌ایم</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prsp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ه<b/>اید</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prsp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ه‌اید</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prsp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ه<b/>اند</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prsp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ه‌اند</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prsp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		
		<e><p><l>ه<b/>شده</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prsp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ه<b/>شده<b/>ام</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prsp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ه<b/>شده<b/>ای</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prsp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ه<b/>شده<b/>است</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prsp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ه<b/>شده<b/>ایم</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prsp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ه<b/>شده<b/>اید</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prsp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ه<b/>شده<b/>اند</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prsp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
	
		<e><p><l>ه<b/>نشده</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prsp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp"/><s n="neg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ه<b/>نشده<b/>ام</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prsp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp"/><s n="neg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ه<b/>نشده<b/>ای</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prsp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp"/><s n="neg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ه<b/>نشده<b/>است</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prsp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp"/><s n="neg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ه<b/>نشده<b/>ایم</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prsp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pp"/><s n="neg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ه<b/>نشده<b/>اید</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prsp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pp"/><s n="neg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ه<b/>نشده<b/>اند</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prsp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pp"/><s n="neg"/></r></p></e>
	
		<e><p><l>ه<b/>بودم</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ه<b/>بودی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ه<b/>بود</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
 		<e><p><l>ه<b/>بودیم</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ه<b/>بودید</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ه<b/>بودند</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	 
	    
		 <e><p><l>ه<b/>شده<b/>بودم</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
		 <e><p><l>ه<b/>شده<b/>بودی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ه<b/>شده<b/>بود</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>ه<b/>شده<b/>بودیم</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ه<b/>شده<b/>بودید</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ه<b/>شده<b/>بودند</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
	 
	 
	    <e><p><l>ه<b/>نشده<b/>بودم</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp"/><s n="neg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>ه<b/>نشده<b/>بودی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp"/><s n="neg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>ه<b/>نشده<b/>بود</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp"/><s n="neg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>ه<b/>نشده<b/>بودیم</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pp"/><s n="neg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ه<b/>نشده<b/>بودید</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pp"/><s n="neg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ه<b/>نشده<b/>بودند</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pp"/><s n="neg"/></r></p></e>
	 
        <e><p><l>ه<b/>باشم</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstsub"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>	
	    <e><p><l>ه<b/>باشی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstsub"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ه<b/>باشد</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstsub"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
 		<e><p><l>ه<b/>باشیم</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstsub"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ه<b/>باشید</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstsub"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ه<b/>باشند</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstsub"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	
	   <e><p><l>ه<b/>شده<b/>باشم</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstsub"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>ه<b/>شده<b/>باشی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstsub"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>ه<b/>شده<b/>باشد</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstsub"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>ه<b/>شده<b/>باشیم</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstsub"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>ه<b/>شده<b/>باشید</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstsub"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>ه<b/>شده<b/>باشند</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstsub"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
	
	   <e><p><l>ه<b/>نشده<b/>باشم</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstsub"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp"/><s n="neg"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>ه<b/>نشده<b/>باشی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstsub"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp"/><s n="neg"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>ه<b/>نشده<b/>باشد</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstsub"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp"/><s n="neg"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>ه<b/>نشده<b/>باشیم</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstsub"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pp"/><s n="neg"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>ه<b/>نشده<b/>باشید</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstsub"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pp"/><s n="neg"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>ه<b/>نشده<b/>باشند</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstsub"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pp"/><s n="neg"/></r></p></e>
	
		<e><p><l>م</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>			
		<e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>یم</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ید</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ند</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    
		<e><p><l>ه<b/>شدم</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ه<b/>شدی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ه<b/>شد</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ه<b/>شدیم</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ه<b/>شدید</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ه<b/>شدند</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

		<e><p><l>ه<b/>نشدم</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp"/><s n="neg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ه<b/>نشدی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp"/><s n="neg"/></r></p></e>

	<e lm="نجات نداد"><p><l>نجات<b/>نداد</l><r>نجات<b/>داد</r></p><par n="fel__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="محفوظ داشت"><i>محفوظ داشت</i><par n="fel__v"/></e>
	<e lm="مرتفع کرد"><i>مرتفع<b/>کرد</i><par n="fel__v"/></e>
	<e lm="مستقر کرد"><i>مستقر کرد</i><par n="fel__v"/></e>
	<e lm="هورا کشید"><i>هورا کشید</i><par n="fel__v"/></e>
	<e lm="کمک کرد"><i>کمک<b/>کرد</i><par n="fel__v"/></e>
	<e lm="ابلاغ کرد"><i>ابلاغ<b/>کرد</i><par n="fel__v"/></e>
	<e lm="خشنود کرد"><i>خشنود<b/>کرد</i><par n="fel__v"/></e>
	<e lm="برگردانید"><i>برگردانید</i><par n="fel__v"/></e>
	<e lm="مواظب بود"><i>مواظب<b/>بود</i><par n="fel__v"/></e>
	<e lm="تبریک گفت"><i>تبریک<b/>گفت</i><par n="fel__v"/></e>
	<e lm="پیاده رفت"><i>پیاده<b/>رفت</i><par n="fel__v"/></e>
	<e lm="از یاد برد"><i>از<b/>یاد<b/>برد</i><par n="fel__v"/></e>
	<e lm="تشکر کرد"><i>تشکر<b/>کرد</i><par n="fel__v"/></e>
	<e lm="خلق شد"><i>خلق<b/>شد</i><par n="fel__v"/></e>
	<e lm="پاره شد"><i>پاره شد</i><par n="fel__v"/></e>
	<e lm="بیدار کرد"><i>بیدار<b/>کرد</i><par n="fel__v"/></e>
	<e lm="خالی کرد"><i>خالی<b/>کرد</i><par n="fel__v"/></e>
	<e lm="روبرو نکرد"><p><l>روبرو<b/>نکرد</l><r>روبرو<b/>کرد</r></p><par n="fel__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="نرسید"><p><l>نرسید</l><r>رسید</r></p><par n="fel__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="ننمود"><p><l>ننمود</l><r>نمود</r></p><par n="fel__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="نیاورد"><p><l>نیاورد</l><r>آورد</r></p><par n="fel__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="نماند"><p><l>نماند</l><r>ماند</r></p><par n="fel__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="نسرایید"><p><l>نسرایید</l><r>سرایید</r></p><par n="fel__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="نگماشت"><p><l>نگماشت</l><r>گماشت</r></p><par n="fel__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="ندوزدید"><p><l>ندوزدید</l><r>دزدید</r></p><par n="fel__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="نیندیشید"><p><l>نیندیشید</l><r>اندیشید</r></p><par n="fel__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="نپیچاند"><p><l>نپیچاند</l><r>پیچاند</r></p><par n="fel__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="نیفراشت"><p><l>نیفراشت</l><r>افراشت</r></p><par n="fel__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="نرنجید"><p><l>نرنجید</l><r>رنجید</r></p><par n="fel__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="ننامید"><p><l>ننامید</l><r>نامید</r></p><par n="fel__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="نجنگید"><p><l>نجنگید</l><r>جنگید</r></p><par n="fel__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="نپوسید"><p><l>نپوسید</l><r>پوسید</r></p><par n="fel__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="عوض نکرد"><p><l>عوض<b/>نکرد</l><r>عوض<b/>کرد</r></p><par n="fel__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="اذیت نکرد"><p><l>اذیت<b/>نکرد</l><r>اذیت<b/>کرد</r></p><par n="fel__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="ناپدید نگشت"><p><l>ناپدید<b/>نگشت</l><r>ناپدید<b/>گشت</r></p><par n="fel__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="تکیه نداد"><p><l>تکیه<b/>نداد</l><r>تکیه<b/>داد</r></p><par n="fel__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="خبر نداشت"><p><l>خبر<b/>نداشت</l><r>خبر<b/>داشت</r></p><par n="fel__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="دستگیر نکرد"><p><l>دستگیر<b/>نکرد</l><r>دستگیر<b/>کرد</r></p><par n="fel__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="نگه نداشت"><p><l>نگه<b/>نداشت</l><r>نگه<b/>داشت</r></p><par n="fel__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="نبخشید"><p><l>نبخشید</l><r>بخشید</r></p><par n="fel__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="نگریست"><p><l>نگریست</l><r>گریست</r></p><par n="fel__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="دنبال کرد"><i>دنبال<b/>کرد</i><par n="fel__v"/></e>
	<e lm="باخبر کرد"><i>باخبر کرد</i><par n="fel__v"/></e>
	<e lm="تکرار کرد"><i>تکرار<b/>کرد</i><par n="fel__v"/></e>
	<e lm="نزدیک شد"><i>نزدیک شد</i><par n="fel__v"/></e>
	<e lm="بلند کرد"><i>بلند<b/>کرد</i><par n="fel__v"/></e>
	<e lm="بررسی کرد"><i>بررسی<b/>کرد</i><par n="fel__v"/></e>
	<e lm="ناراحت کرد"><i>ناراحت<b/>کرد</i><par n="fel__v"/></e>
	<e lm="معرفی کرد"><i>معرفی<b/>کرد</i><par n="fel__v"/></e>
	<e lm="در نظر گرفت"><i>در<b/>نظر<b/>گرفت</i><par n="fel__v"/></e>
